Hawaii, session 2026, SB632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that several U.S. cities and at least one state incorporate sustainable building practices into affordable housing initiatives.  One particular model is California's Green Building Standards Code, known as "CALGreen".  The purpose of CALGreen is to "improve public health, safety, and general welfare by enhancing the design and construction of buildings through the use of building concepts having a reduced negative impact or positive environmental impact and encouraging sustainable construction practices." The legislature further finds that green building practices can positively contribute to housing affordability.  This includes lower energy bills for residents due to energy-efficient buildings that use less electricity and water, reduced operating costs resulting from sustainable construction practices, such as better insulation and high-efficiency climate control systems, and greater durability and maintenance from sustainable materials and construction techniques that extend the lifespan of a building and reduce maintenance costs.  Also, many green building programs offer financial incentives, tax credits, and grants for incorporating sustainable practices, which can offset the initial costs of green construction thus making it more feasible for affordable housing developers.  Finally, green buildings often provide healthier indoor environments with better air quality and natural lighting that can lead to improved health outcomes (and reduced healthcare costs) for residents. The purpose of this Act is to adopt a green building standards code. SECTION 2.  Section 107-25, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§107-25  Hawaii state building codes; requirements.  There is established the Hawaii state building codes applicable to all construction in the State of Hawaii.  The Hawaii state building codes shall be based upon: (1)  The state fire code as adopted by the state fire council; (2)  The Uniform Plumbing Code, as copyrighted and published by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials, including its appendices; (3)  The International Building Code, the International Residential Code, and the International Energy Conservation Code, as published by the International Code Council; (4)  The National Electrical Code, as published by the National Fire Protection Association; (5)  Hawaii design standards implementing the criteria pursuant to Act 5, Special Session Laws of Hawaii, 2005, as applicable to: (A)  Emergency shelters built to comply with hurricane resistant criteria, including enhanced hurricane protection areas capable of withstanding a five hundred-year hurricane event as well as other storms and natural hazards; and (B)  Essential government facilities requiring continuity of operations; [and] (6)  Code provisions based on nationally published codes or standards that include but are not limited to residential and hurricane resistant standards related to loss mitigation standards in accordance with section 431P-12, elevator, mechanical, flood and tsunami, existing buildings, and onsite sewage disposal[.]; and (7)  Hawaii green building standards adopted pursuant to Act     , Session Laws of Hawaii 2025." SECTION 3. The state building code council shall develop and adopt a green building standards code similar to the California Green Building Standards Code, part 11, title 24, California Code of Regulations. The state building code council, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the 2026 regular session, shall submit a report to the legislature regarding the development of the green building standards code. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________